Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Leaves of Absence

45-20-30.
Leave of absence for blood donation.

Each state, county, and municipal officer and employee in this state shall be allowed a leave of absence, without loss of pay, of not more than eight hours in each calendar year for the purpose of donating blood. This absence shall be computed at two hours per donation, up to four times per year. However, any such officer or employee who donates blood platelets or granulocytes through the plasmapheresis process shall be allowed a leave of absence, without loss of pay, of not more than 16 hours in each calendar year which shall be computed at four hours per donation, up to four times per year.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 165, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 845, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 34; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

45-20-31.
Leave of absence for organ or bone marrow donation.

Each employee of the State of Georgia or of any branch, department, board, bureau, or commission of the State of Georgia who serves as an organ donor for the purpose of transplantation shall receive a leave of absence, with pay, of 30 days and such leave shall not be charged against or deducted from any annual or sick leave and shall be included as service in computing any retirement or pension benefits. The employee shall not be entitled to such leave of absence with pay unless he or she furnishes to his or her supervisor or other proper authority a statement from a medical practitioner who is to perform such transplantation procedure or from a hospital administrator that the employee is making an organ donation as provided in this Code section. If such donation does not occur, the provisions of this Code section shall not be applicable. For the purposes of this Code section, the term “organ” means a human organ, including an eye, that is capable of being transferred from the body of a person to the body of another person.

Each employee of the State of Georgia or of any branch, department, board, bureau, or commission of the State of Georgia who serves as a bone marrow donor for the purpose of transplantation shall receive a leave of absence, with pay, of seven days and such leave shall not be charged against or deducted from any annual or sick leave and shall be included as service in computing any retirement or pension benefits. The employee shall not be entitled to such leave of absence with pay unless he or she furnishes to his or her supervisor or other proper authority a statement from a medical practitioner who is to perform such transplantation procedure or from a hospital administrator that the employee is serving as a bone marrow donor as provided in this Code section. If such donation does not occur, the provisions of this Code section shall not be applicable.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 907, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 45; Ga. L. 2002, p. 473, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 1-1/HB 642.

45-20-32.
Limited paid leave for the purpose of promoting education.

Each full-time, nontemporary employee of the State of Georgia or of any branch, department, board, bureau, or commission thereof shall be entitled to apply for up to eight hours of paid leave per calendar year for the purpose of promoting education in this state. The State Personnel Board shall submit to the Governor for approval rules and regulations which shall effectuate the purpose and govern the administration of this Code section. Such rules and regulations shall require that paid leave only be authorized for activities directly related to student achievement and academic support and shall prohibit the use of such leave for political purposes or agendas.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-20-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 934, § 1/HB 313.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2015.